Utah statutes.
31A-37-105.   Operation of a branch captive insurance company.
Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a branch captive insurance
company must be a pure captive insurance company with respect to operations in
this state, unless otherwise permitted by the commissioner under Section
31A-37-106.
